Vermont, session 2025-2026, H683.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 2607 is added to read:
§ 2607. PUBLIC NUDITY
(a) Offense. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall
knowingly expose the person’s pubic area, genitals, or buttocks with less than
an opaque covering when the person is in a place where the person can be seen
by others in a public place. For purposes of this section, “public place”
VT LEG #385273 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.683
2026 Page 2 of 2
includes situations where the person who exposes the person’s pubic area,
genitals, or buttocks may be on private property such as the person’s front
yard, but the person is visible to a public space like a sidewalk, road, or
neighboring property.
(b) Penalty. A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be
imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
(c) Exceptions.
(1) This section shall not apply when a person disrobes in a location
intended for such conduct such as a changing room.
(2) The legislative body of a municipality may adopt an ordinance or
bylaw that designates public places within the municipality where a person
may expose the person’s pubic area, genitals, or buttocks. A municipal
ordinance adopted pursuant to this subdivision may authorize events where a
person may expose the person’s pubic area, genitals, or buttocks, and the
municipality may issue a permit for the event.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385273 v.2